Florida, session 2026, HB1525.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 800.02, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
Section 2. Section 800.035, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
800.035 Indecent exposure of sexual organs while observing
a child.—
(1) A person commits the offense of indecent exposure of
sexual organs while observing a child if that person, while
observing a child under 16 years of age for the purpose of his
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1525 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1525 2026 Legislature
or her own sexual arousal or gratification:
(a) Intentionally exposes his or her sexual organs in a
lewd or lascivious manner; or
(b) Intentionally performs any sexual act that does not
involve actual physical or sexual contact with the child,
including, but not limited to, sadomasochistic abuse, sexual
bestiality, masturbation, or the simulation of any act involving
sexual activity.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "observing"
means intentionally viewing another person under circumstances
in which the offender is reasonably capable of being seen by the
person being viewed.
(3) A person who commits indecent exposure of sexual
organs while observing a child commits a felony of the third
degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
775.084.
(4) It is not a defense under this section that the person
being observed was not aware of any specific conduct on the part
of the offender or did not see the offender's sexual organs.
(5) A person does not commit the offense of indecent
exposure of sexual organs while observing a child if the person
is either of the following:
(a) A mother who is breastfeeding her baby.
(b) An individual who is merely nude in a place provided
or set apart for that purpose.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1525 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1525 2026 Legislature
Section 3. Section 914.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
914.16 Child abuse and sexual abuse of victims under age
16 or who have an intellectual disability; limits on
interviews.—The chief judge of each judicial circuit, after
consultation with the state attorney and the public defender for
the judicial circuit, the appropriate chief law enforcement
officer, and any other person deemed appropriate by the chief
judge, shall order reasonable limits on the number of interviews
which a victim of a violation of s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s.
827.03, or s. 847.0135(5) who is under 16 years of age or a
victim of a violation of s. 794.011, s. 800.02, s. 800.03, or s.
825.102 who has an intellectual disability as defined in s.
393.063 must submit to for law enforcement or discovery
purposes. To the extent possible, the order must protect the
victim from the psychological damage of repeated interrogations
while preserving the rights of the public, the victim, and the
person charged with the violation.
Section 4. Paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of section
933.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
933.18 When warrant may be issued for search of private
dwelling.—No search warrant shall issue under this chapter or
under any other law of this state to search any private dwelling
occupied as such unless:
(7) One or more of the following child abuse offenses is
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1525 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1525 2026 Legislature
being committed there:
(b) Commission of an unnatural and lascivious act with a
child, in violation of s. 800.02.

If, during a search pursuant to a warrant issued under this
section, a child is discovered and appears to be in imminent
danger, the law enforcement officer conducting such search may
remove the child from the private dwelling and take the child
into protective custody pursuant to chapter 39. The term
"private dwelling" shall be construed to include the room or
rooms used and occupied, not transiently but solely as a
residence, in an apartment house, hotel, boardinghouse, or
lodginghouse. No warrant shall be issued for the search of any
private dwelling under any of the conditions hereinabove
mentioned except on sworn proof by affidavit of some creditable
witness that he or she has reason to believe that one of said
conditions exists, which affidavit shall set forth the facts on
which such reason for belief is based.
Section 5. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1525 -02-er